Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2109
Assessments; discontinue, when; effect.

(1) The department shall discontinue the collection of assessments when federal matching funds are unavailable. In such case, the department shall terminate the collection of the assessments beginning on the date such federal matching funds become unavailable.

(2) If collection of assessments is discontinued as provided in this section, the money in the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund shall be returned to the hospitals from which the assessments were collected on the same proportional basis as the assessments were assessed for the quarter in which the assessment was terminated.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 9.